Utah statutes.
34-30-13.   Compliance with federal requirements.
Notwithstanding any other provision in this chapter to the contrary, the
governor of the state of Utah may in his discretion, elect to suspend the
provisions of this chapter in whole or in part if it becomes necessary to do
so in order to comply with requirements imposed by the government of the
United States, in order for the state of Utah to remain eligible for
participation in programs which are financed in whole or in part by the United
States government.
